Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1205.05
Board; reports.

The board shall provide quarterly reports to the Executive Board of the Legislative Council and Nebraska Information Technology Commission on its activities pursuant to sections 84-1205 to 84-1205.04.

Laws 1997, LB 590, § 11;

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 55.